West Virginia, session 2025, HB2597.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 22. STATE LOTTERY ACT. §29-22-18d. Increase in allocation to West Virginia Infrastructure Fund from State Excess Lottery Revenue Fund. Notwithstanding any provision of §29-22-18a of this code to the contrary, the deposit of $40 million into the West Virginia Infrastructure Fund set forth above is for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2010, only. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2011 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, in lieu of the deposits required under §29-22-18a(d)(5) of this code, the commission shall, first, deposit $6 million into the West Virginia Infrastructure Lottery Revenue Debt Service Fund created in §31-15A-9(h) of this code, to be spent in accordance with the provisions of that subsection and, second, deposit $40 million into the West Virginia Infrastructure Fund created in, §31-15A-9(a) of this code, to be spent in accordance with the provisions of that article. Provided, That for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2014, the deposit to the West Virginia Infrastructure Fund shall be $20 million: Provided, however, That notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), section ten, article fifteen-a, chapter thirty-one of this code, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2014, any moneys disbursed from the West Virginia Infrastructure Fund in the form of grants may not exceed fifty percent of the total funds available for the funding of projects: Provided further, That for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2015, the deposit to the West Virginia Infrastructure Fund shall be $30 million: And provided further, That notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), section ten, article fifteen-a, chapter thirty-one of this code, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2015, any moneys disbursed from the West Virginia Infrastructure Fund in the form of grants may not exceed fifty percent of the total funds available for the funding of projects: And provided further, That for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the deposit to the West Virginia Infrastructure Fund shall be $20 million: And provided further, That notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), section ten, article fifteen-a, chapter thirty-one of this code, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, any moneys disbursed from the West Virginia Infrastructure Fund in the form of grants may not exceed fifty percent of the total funds available for the funding of projects Article 22A. Racetrack video lottery. §29-22A-10d. Changes in distribution of net terminal income; distributions from excess lottery fund. [Repealed.] §29-22A-10e. Changes in distribution of excess net terminal income; distributions from excess lottery fund. [Repealed.] §29-22A-10f. Changes in distribution of surcharge. [Repealed.] ARTICLE 22c.  WEST VIRGINIA LOTTERY RACETRACK TABLE GAMES ACT. §29-22C-27a. Changes in distribution of adjusted gross receipts; distributions from excess lottery fund. [Repealed.] Article 25.  Authorized gaming facility. §29-25-22b. Changes in distribution of adjusted gross receipts and additional income; distributions from excess lottery fund. [Repealed.]